Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.075

Court commissioners—Appointment—Qualification—Limitations—Part-time judge.

(1) One or more court commissioners may be appointed by a judge of the municipal court.

(2) Each commissioner holds office at the pleasure of the appointing judge.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a commissioner has such power, authority, and jurisdiction in criminal and civil matters as the appointing judges possess, and must be a lawyer who is admitted to practice law in the state of Washington or a nonlawyer who has passed, by January 1, 2003, the qualifying examination for lay judges for courts of limited jurisdiction under RCW 3.34.060.

(4) On or after July 1, 2010, when serving as a commissioner, the commissioner does not have authority to preside over trials in criminal matters, or jury trials in civil matters unless agreed to on the record by all parties.

(5) A commissioner need not be a resident of the city or of the county in which the municipal court is created. When a court commissioner has not been appointed and the municipal court is presided over by a part-time appointed judge, the judge need not be a resident of the city or of the county in which the municipal court is created.

(6) For purposes of this section, "appointing judge" includes a presiding judge pro tempore fulfilling presiding judge duties for a single judge court pursuant to RCW 3.50.090(2).

[ 2022 c 74 s 10; 2019 c 52 s 1; 2008 c 227 s 8; 1994 c 10 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: See notes following RCW 3.50.003.